Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.310

Acquisition, construction, equipping and betterment of lands, buildings and facilities at universities and The Evergreen State College—Bonds—Sale, interest, form, payment, term, execution, negotiability, etc.

Each issue or series of such bonds: Shall be sold at such price and at such rate or rates of interest; may be serial or term bonds; may mature at such time or times in not to exceed forty years from date of issue; may be sold at public or private sale; may be payable both principal and interest at such place or places; may be subject to redemption prior to any fixed maturities; may be in such denominations; may be payable to bearer or to the purchaser or purchasers thereof or may be registrable as to principal or principal and interest as provided in RCW 39.46.030; may be issued under and subject to such terms, conditions, and covenants providing for the payment of the principal thereof and interest thereon, which may include the creation and maintenance of a reserve fund or account to secure the payment of such principal and interest and a provision that additional bonds payable out of the same source or sources may later be issued on a parity therewith, and such other terms, conditions, covenants, and protective provisions safeguarding such payment, all as determined and found necessary and desirable by said boards of regents or trustees. If found reasonably necessary and advisable, such boards of regents or trustees may select a trustee for the owners of each such issue or series of bonds and/or for the safeguarding and disbursements of the proceeds of their sale for the uses and purposes for which they were issued and, if such trustee or trustees are so selected, shall fix its or their rights, duties, powers, and obligations. The bonds of each such issue or series: Shall be executed on behalf of such universities or colleges by the president of the board of regents or the chair of the board of trustees, and shall be attested by the secretary or the treasurer of such board, one of which signatures may be a facsimile signature; and shall have the seal of such university or college impressed, printed, or lithographed thereon, and any interest coupons attached thereto shall be executed with the facsimile signatures of said officials. The bonds of each such issue or series and any of the coupons attached thereto shall be negotiable instruments within the provisions and intent of the negotiable instruments law of this state even though they shall be payable solely from any special fund or funds.

[ 2011 c 336 s 709; 1983 c 167 s 31; 1972 ex.s. c 25 s 1; 1970 ex.s. c 56 s 22; 1969 ex.s. c 232 s 96; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.310. Prior: 1961 c 229 s 7. Formerly RCW 28.76.192.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.

Purpose—1970 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 39.52.020.

Validation—Saving—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 232: See notes following RCW 39.52.020.